Illinois, session 104th, HB1498.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Sections 4-14.1 and 9-8.10 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/4-14.1)  (from Ch. 46, par. 4-14.1)7    Sec. 4-14.1. Cancelation of deceased voter's registration. 8    (a) Upon establishment of an electronic reporting system 9for death registrations as provided in the Vital Records Act, 10the county clerk of the county where a decedent last resided, 11as indicated on the decedent's death certificate, shall may 12issue certifications of death records from that system and 13shall may use that system to cancel the registration of any 14person who has died during the preceding month. Regardless of 15whether or not such a system has been established, it is the 16duty of the county clerk to examine, monthly, the records 17deposited in his or her office pursuant to the Vital Records 18Act that relate to deaths in the county, and to cancel the 19registration of any person who has died during the preceding 20month. The county coroner, medical examiner, or physician for 21a county or any other individual responsible for certification 22of death under Section 18 of the Vital Records Act shall 23promptly transmit certified records to the county clerk within   HB1498- 2 -LRB104 06583 SPS 16619 b17 days after the death of the decedent. The county clerk and 2coroner shall report quarterly to its affiliated county board 3and certify its full compliance with this Section and accuracy 4of the voter rolls.5    (b) Any person may request a copy of the report required in 6subsection (a). Failure to provide an accurate report by the 7county clerk within 5 business days, or 48 hours if 30 days 8before an election, may file suit for injunction or 9declaratory relief to enforce subsection (a) or this 10subsection (b). 11    (c) The circuit court shall have the jurisdiction to 12order: (i) production of deposits of records; (ii) production 13of required reports; and (iii) compliance with subsection (a), 14including establishing the accuracy of the voter registration 15rolls. 16    (d) If a person seeking the right to receive a copy of the 17documents pursuant to subsection (a) or enforce the provision 18of subsection (a) prevails in a proceeding under this Section, 19the court shall award such person reasonable attorney's fees 20and costs. In determining what amount of attorney's fees is 21reasonable, the court shall consider the degree to which the 22relief obtained relates to the relief sought. 23    (e) If the court determines that a public body willfully 24and intentionally failed to comply with this Section, or 25otherwise acted in bad faith, the court shall also impose upon 26the public body a civil penalty of not less than $2,500 nor   HB1498- 3 -LRB104 06583 SPS 16619 b1more than $5,000 for each occurrence. In assessing the civil 2penalty, the court shall consider in aggravation or mitigation 3the budget of the public body and whether the public body has 4previously been assessed penalties for violations of this 5Section. The court may impose an additional penalty of up to 6$1,000 for each day the violation continues if: 7        (1) the public body fails to comply with the court's 8    order after 30 days; 9        (2) the court's order is not on appeal or stayed; and 10        (3) the court does not grant the public body 11    additional time to comply with the court's order to 12    disclose public records. 13(Source: P.A. 96-1484, eff. 1-1-11.) 14    (10 ILCS 5/9-8.10)15    Sec. 9-8.10. Use of political committee and other 16reporting organization funds. 17    (a) A political committee shall not make expenditures: 18        (1) In violation of any law of the United States or of 19    this State. 20        (2) Clearly in excess of the fair market value of the 21    services, materials, facilities, or other things of value 22    received in exchange. 23        (3) For satisfaction or repayment of any debts other 24    than loans made to the committee or to the public official 25    or candidate on behalf of the committee or repayment of   HB1498- 4 -LRB104 06583 SPS 16619 b1    goods and services purchased by the committee under a 2    credit agreement. Nothing in this Section authorizes the 3    use of campaign funds to repay personal loans. The 4    repayments shall be made by check written to the person 5    who made the loan or credit agreement. The terms and 6    conditions of any loan or credit agreement to a committee 7    shall be set forth in a written agreement, including but 8    not limited to the method and amount of repayment, that 9    shall be executed by the chair or treasurer of the 10    committee at the time of the loan or credit agreement. The 11    loan or agreement shall also set forth the rate of 12    interest for the loan, if any, which may not substantially 13    exceed the prevailing market interest rate at the time the 14    agreement is executed. 15        (4) For the satisfaction or repayment of any debts or 16    for the payment of any expenses relating to a personal 17    residence. Campaign funds may not be used as collateral 18    for home mortgages. 19        (5) For clothing or personal laundry expenses, except 20    clothing items rented by the public official or candidate 21    for his or her own use exclusively for a specific 22    campaign-related event, provided that committees may 23    purchase costumes, novelty items, or other accessories 24    worn primarily to advertise the candidacy. 25        (6) For the travel expenses of any person unless the 26    travel is necessary for fulfillment of political,   HB1498- 5 -LRB104 06583 SPS 16619 b1    governmental, or public policy duties, activities, or 2    purposes. 3        (7) For membership or club dues charged by 4    organizations, clubs, or facilities that are primarily 5    engaged in providing health, exercise, or recreational 6    services; provided, however, that funds received under 7    this Article may be used to rent the clubs or facilities 8    for a specific campaign-related event. 9        (8) In payment for anything of value or for 10    reimbursement of any expenditure for which any person has 11    been reimbursed by the State or any person. For purposes 12    of this item (8), a per diem allowance is not a 13    reimbursement. 14        (9) For the lease or purchase of or installment 15    payment for a motor vehicle unless the political committee 16    can demonstrate the vehicle will be used primarily for 17    campaign purposes or for the performance of governmental 18    duties. Nothing in this paragraph prohibits a political 19    committee from using political funds to make expenditures 20    related to vehicles not purchased or leased by a political 21    committee, provided the expenditure relates to the use of 22    the vehicle for primarily campaign purposes or the 23    performance of governmental duties. Persons using vehicles 24    not purchased or leased by a political committee may be 25    reimbursed for actual mileage for the use of the vehicle 26    for campaign purposes or for the performance of   HB1498- 6 -LRB104 06583 SPS 16619 b1    governmental duties. The mileage reimbursements shall be 2    made at a rate not to exceed the standard mileage rate 3    method for computation of business expenses under the 4    Internal Revenue Code. 5        (10) Directly for an individual's tuition or other 6    educational expenses, except for governmental or political 7    purposes directly related to a candidate's or public 8    official's duties and responsibilities. 9        (11) For payments to a public official or candidate or 10    his or her family member unless for compensation for 11    services actually rendered by that person. The provisions 12    of this item (11) do not apply to expenditures by a 13    political committee for expenses related to providing 14    childcare for a minor child or care for a dependent family 15    member if the care is reasonably necessary for the public 16    official or candidate to fulfill political or governmental 17    duties. The provisions of this item (11) do not apply to 18    expenditures by a political committee in an aggregate 19    amount not exceeding the amount of funds reported to and 20    certified by the State Board or county clerk as available 21    as of June 30, 1998, in the semi-annual report of 22    contributions and expenditures filed by the political 23    committee for the period concluding June 30, 1998.24        (12) For payments to attorneys, expert witnesses, 25    investigators, or others to provide a defense in a 26    criminal case.   HB1498- 7 -LRB104 06583 SPS 16619 b1    (b) The Board shall have the authority to investigate, 2upon receipt of a verified complaint, violations of the 3provisions of this Section. The Board may levy a fine on any 4person who knowingly makes expenditures in violation of this 5Section and on any person who knowingly makes a malicious and 6false accusation of a violation of this Section. The Board may 7act under this subsection only upon the affirmative vote of at 8least 5 of its members. The fine shall not exceed $500 for each 9expenditure of $500 or less and shall not exceed the amount of 10the expenditure plus $500 for each expenditure greater than 11$500. The Board shall also have the authority to render 12rulings and issue opinions relating to compliance with this 13Section. 14    (c) Nothing in this Section prohibits the expenditure of 15funds of a political committee controlled by an officeholder 16or by a candidate to defray the customary and reasonable 17expenses of an officeholder in connection with the performance 18of governmental and public service functions. 19    (d) Nothing in this Section prohibits the funds of a 20political committee which is controlled by a person convicted 21of a violation of any of the offenses listed in subsection (a) 22of Section 10 of the Public Corruption Profit Forfeiture Act 23from being forfeited to the State under Section 15 of the 24Public Corruption Profit Forfeiture Act. 25(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21.)   HB1498- 8 -LRB104 06583 SPS 16619 b1    Section 10. The Attorney General Act is amended by adding 2Section 6.7 as follows: 3    (15 ILCS 205/6.7 new)4    Sec. 6.7. Office of Election Integrity.5    (a) The Office of Election Integrity is created within the 6Office of the Attorney General. The purpose of the Office is to 7aid the State Board of Elections in completion of its duties 8under the Election Code by:9        (1) Receiving and reviewing notices and reports 10    generated by government officials or any other person 11    regarding alleged occurrences of election law violations 12    or election irregularities in this State.13        (2) Initiating independent inquiries and conducting 14    preliminary investigations into allegations of election 15    law violations or election irregularities in this State.16    (b) The Office may review complaints and conduct 17preliminary investigations into alleged violations of the 18Election Code or any rule adopted pursuant to the Election 19Code and any election irregularities.20    (c) The Attorney General in conjunction with the Chair of 21the State Board of Elections shall appoint a Director of the 22Office of Election Integrity.23    (d) The Office shall be based in Springfield and shall 24employ nonsworn investigators to conduct any investigations. 25The positions and resources necessary for the Office to   HB1498- 9 -LRB104 06583 SPS 16619 b1accomplish its duties shall be established through and subject 2to the legislative appropriations process.3    (e) The Office shall develop and create a voter fraud 4hotline within 90 days after the effective date of this 5amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.6    (f) The Office shall oversee the voter fraud hotline.7    (g) This Section does not limit the jurisdiction of any 8other office or agency of this State empowered by law to 9investigate, act upon, or dispose of alleged election law 10violations.11    (h) By January 15 of each year, the Office shall submit a 12report to the Governor, the President of the Senate, the 13Minority Leader of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of 14Representatives, and the Minority Leader of the House of 15Representatives detailing information on investigations of 16alleged election law violations or election irregularities 17conducted during the prior calendar year. The report shall 18include the total number of complaints received and 19independent investigations initiated and the number of 20complaints referred to another State agency for further 21investigation or prosecution. For each alleged violation or 22irregularity investigated, the report shall include:23        (1)the source of the alleged violation or 24    irregularity;25        (2) the law allegedly violated or the nature of the 26    irregularity reported;  HB1498- 10 -LRB104 06583 SPS 16619 b1        (3) the county in which the alleged violation or 2    irregularity occurred;3        (4) whether the alleged violation or irregularity was 4    referred to another State agency for further investigation 5    or prosecution and, if so, to which State agency; and6        (5) the current status of the investigation or 7    resulting criminal case.